California statutes. Water Code
(b) The petitioner shall provide notice by registered or electronic mail to each person on the list of interested persons provided by the board and the list of interested persons maintained by any groundwater sustainability agency or local agency for the basin where the water is proposed
 to be stored. The petitioner shall provide proof of notice to the board.

(c) Any interested person may file an objection to the temporary diversion and use with the board within 30 days of the mailing of the notice by the petitioner. A person filing an objection shall send a copy to the applicant.

(d) The board shall consider an objection, and may hold a hearing on the objection after notice to all interested persons, before acting upon a petition for a temporary change order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 15.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1443.4.

The board shall supervise diversion and use of water under a change order issued under this article for the protection of all lawful users of water and instream beneficial uses and for compliance with change order conditions. The change order may require a person who extracts water stored under the change order to comply with regulatory and permitting requirements for groundwater extraction set by the groundwater sustainability plan or alternative approved pursuant to Section 10733.6 for the basin.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 15.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1443.5.

A change order issued under this article shall not result in the creation of a vested right, even of a temporary nature. The change order is subject, at all times, to modification or revocation at the discretion of the board, after the permittee or licensee has adequate notice and an adequate opportunity to be heard concerning any proposed modification or revocation. The authorization to divert and use water under the change order shall automatically expire five years after the authorization takes effect, unless an earlier date is specified or the temporary change order is revoked, and shall be junior in priority to any subsequent appropriation not subject to this chapter. The five-year period does not include any time required for monitoring,
 reporting, or mitigation before or after the authorization to divert or use water under the change order. The five-year period is a limitation on the authorization to divert and not a limitation on the authorization for beneficial use of the water diverted to underground storage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 15.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1443.6.

The board may renew a change order issued under this article if the board, in its judgment, concludes that the petitioner has exercised due diligence in applying for a change pursuant to provisions of this division, other than this chapter, and in pursuing that petition once it is filed. The board shall process a request for a renewal of a change order issued under this article pursuant to this article. The board may request the petitioner to file maps, drawings, or other data furnished with the original petition for the change order. Each renewal of a change order issued under this article shall be valid for a period not to exceed five years from the date of renewal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 15.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1443.7.

This article does not apply to any permittee or licensee petitioning for a temporary change pursuant to Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 1725).

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 678, Sec. 15.   (AB 658)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Priorities [1450. - 1491.]



  ARTICLE 1. Priority of Application [1450. - 1450.]

1450.

Any application properly made gives to the applicant a priority of right as of the date of the application until such application is approved or rejected. Such priority continues only so long as the provisions of law and the rules and regulations of the board are followed by the applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Effect of Issuance of Permit [1455. - 1455.]

1455.

The issuance of a permit continues in effect the priority of right as of the date of the application and gives the right to take and use the amount of water specified in the permit until the issuance of a license for the use of the water or until the permit is revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1087.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Preferred Priorities of Municipalities [1460. - 1464.]

1460.

The application for a permit by a municipality for the use of water for the municipality or the inhabitants thereof for domestic purposes shall be considered first in right, irrespective of whether it is first in time.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1461.

The application for, or the granting of, a permit to any municipality to appropriate water does not authorize the appropriation of any water for other than municipal purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1462.

Where permission to appropriate is granted to any municipality for any quantity of water in excess of the existing municipal needs therefor, the board may, pending the application to beneficial use of the entire appropriation permitted, issue permits for the temporary appropriation of the excess of the permitted appropriation over and above the quantity being applied to beneficial use from time to time by the municipality.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1463.

When the municipality desires to use the additional water granted in its application it may do so upon making just compensation for the facilities for taking, conveying, and storing the additional water rendered valueless for said purposes to the person who constructed the facilities. The compensation, if not agreed upon, may be determined in the manner provided by law for determining the value of property taken by eminent domain proceedings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1464.

In lieu of the granting of such temporary permits for appropriation, the board may authorize the municipality to become as to such surplus a public utility, subject to the jurisdiction and control of the Public Utilities Commission of the State for such period from and after the date of the issuance of such permission to appropriate, as may be allowed for the application to municipal uses of the entire appropriation permitted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Priority of Reservoir Systems Constituting Single Unit [1475. - 1475.]

1475.

In any case where a reservoir has been or shall hereafter under the provisions of this division be constructed, or surveyed, laid out, and proposed to be constructed, for the storage of water for a system, which water is to be used at one or more points under appropriations of water and rights held and owned by the person owning the reservoir site and constructing the reservoir, the reservoir, appropriations, and rights shall, in the discretion of the board constitute a single enterprise and unit, and work of constructing the reservoir, or work on any one of the appropriations shall, in the discretion of the board, be sufficient to maintain and preserve all applications for appropriations and rights thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Applications in Aid of State Water Plan [1480. - 1480.]

1480.

An application by the Department of Water Resources, or an application by the Department of Finance prior to July 5, 1956, in aid of any general or coordinated water plan has such priority as is now or may hereafter be provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Applications by Governmental Agencies Discharging Disposal Water [1485. - 1486.]

1485.

Any municipality, governmental agency, or political subdivision operating waste disposal plants producing disposal water meeting the requirements of the appropriate regional board, and disposing of said water in the San Joaquin River may file an application for a permit to appropriate an equal amount of water, less diminution by seepage, evaporation, transpiration or other natural causes between the point of discharge and the point of recovery, downstream from said disposal plant and out of the San Joaquin River or the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta. A permit to appropriate such amount of water may be granted by the board upon such terms and conditions as in the board’s judgment are necessary for the protection of the rights of others. Water so appropriated may be sold or utilized for any beneficial purpose. The right to the use of water granted by this section shall not include water flowing in underground streams.

The Legislature finds and declares that the problems incident to the full utilization of the waters of the San Joaquin River and the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta into which it flows, are unique and that a general law cannot be made applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 284.)
-------------------------------------------

1486.

(a) The Sacramento Regional County Sanitation District, and any successor thereto, with respect to treated wastewater produced by the sanitation district that meets the requirements of the Central Valley Regional Water Quality Control Board, as may be amended or modified, and that is discharged into the Sacramento River, may file an application for a permit to appropriate an amount of water up to the amount of treated wastewater that is discharged into the Sacramento River, less diminution by seepage, evaporation, transportation, or other natural causes between the point of discharge from its wastewater treatment plant and the point of diversion out of the Sacramento River or the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta.

(b) Upon application for a permit to appropriate water
 pursuant to subdivision (a), the board may grant the permit subject to the terms and conditions as in the board’s judgment are necessary for the protection of the rights of any legal user of the water.

(c) Prior to the board granting a permit under subdivision (b), the board shall comply with the provisions of this part, and other applicable law, and may impose terms and conditions authorized thereunder.

(d) Water appropriated in accordance with this section may be sold or utilized for any beneficial purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 184.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Priority of Applications for Hydroelectric Power [1490. - 1491.]

1490.

Applications or petitions for retrofit hydroelectric plants at existing dams, canals, or conduits where the streamflow regime will not be changed and where there will be no significant adverse environmental impacts shall receive expedited processing by the board. The applicant shall not be required to show a need for the power that will be generated by the plant unless protests are filed that are not resolved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1484, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1491.

Applications for hydroelectric powerplants with a generating capacity not to exceed five megawatts, which do not impound water during times of high waterflow to be used to generate power during times of low waterflow, and which will not have any significant adverse environmental impacts shall receive expedited processing by the board. The applicant shall not be required to show a need for the power that will be generated by the plant unless protests are filed against the project that are not resolved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1484, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Water Right Fees [1525. - 1560.]



  ARTICLE 1. Fee Schedules [1525. - 1530.]

1525.

(a) Each person or entity who holds a permit or license to appropriate water, and each lessor of water leased under Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 1020) of Part 1, shall pay an annual fee according to a fee schedule established by the board.

(b) Each person or entity who files any of the following shall pay a fee according to a fee schedule established by the board:

(1) An application for a permit to appropriate water.

(2) A registration of appropriation for a small domestic use, small irrigation use, or livestock stockpond use.

(3) A petition for an extension of time
 within which to begin construction, to complete construction, or to apply the water to full beneficial use under a permit.

(4) A petition to change the point of diversion, place of use, or purpose of use, under a permit, license, or registration.

(5) A petition to change the conditions of a permit or license, requested by the permittee or licensee, that is not otherwise subject to paragraph (3) or (4).

(6) A petition to change the point of discharge, place of use, or purpose of use, of treated wastewater, requested pursuant to Section 1211.

(7) An application for approval of a water lease agreement.

(8) A request for release from priority pursuant to Section 10504.

(9) An application for an assignment of a state-filed application pursuant to Section 10504.

(10) A statement of water diversion and use pursuant to Part 5.1 (commencing with Section 5100) that reports that water was used for cannabis cultivation.

(c) (1) The board shall set the fee schedule authorized by this section so that the total amount of fees collected pursuant to this section equals that amount necessary to recover costs incurred in connection with the issuance, administration, review, monitoring, and enforcement of permits, licenses, certificates, and registrations to appropriate water, water leases, statements of water diversion and use for cannabis cultivation, and orders
 approving changes in point of discharge, place of use, or purpose of use of treated wastewater. The board may include, as recoverable costs, but is not limited to including, the costs incurred in reviewing applications, registrations, statements of water diversion and use for cannabis cultivation, petitions and requests, prescribing terms of permits, licenses, registrations, and change orders, enforcing and evaluating compliance with permits, licenses, certificates, registrations, change orders, and water leases, inspection, monitoring, planning, modeling, reviewing documents prepared for the purpose of regulating the diversion and use of water, applying and enforcing the prohibition set forth in Section 1052 against the unauthorized diversion or use of water subject to this division and the water diversion related provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 26060) of Division 10 of the Business and Professions Code, and the administrative costs incurred in connection with carrying out these actions.

(2) In setting the fee schedule for fees subject to subdivision (b) of Section 1433.2 and subdivision (b) of Section 1443.2, the board shall also include an amount estimated by the board, in consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, necessary to recover costs incurred by the Department of Fish and Wildlife under Article 2 (commencing with Section 1433) of Chapter 6.5 and Article 2 (commencing with Section 1443) of Chapter 6.6.

(d) (1) The board shall
 adopt the schedule of fees authorized under this section as emergency regulations in accordance with Section 1530.

(2) For filings subject to subdivision (b), the schedule may provide for a single filing fee or for an initial filing fee followed by an annual fee, as appropriate to the type of filing involved, and may include supplemental fees for filings that have already been made but have not yet been acted upon by the board at the time the schedule of fees takes effect.

(3) The board shall set the amount of total revenue collected each year through the fees authorized by this section at an amount equal to the amounts appropriated by the Legislature for expenditure for support of water rights program activities from the Water Rights Fund established under Section 1550, taking into account the reserves in the Water Rights Fund. The board shall review and revise the fees each
 fiscal year as necessary to conform to the amounts appropriated. If the board determines that the revenue collected during the preceding year was greater than, or less than, the amounts appropriated, the board may further adjust the annual fees to compensate for the over or under collection of revenue.

(e) Annual fees imposed pursuant to this section for the 2003–04 fiscal year shall be assessed for the entire 2003–04 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 18, Sec. 6.   (AB 92)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1528.

Each person or entity who files a proof of claim under Article 4 (commencing with Section 2575) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 shall pay a fee according to a fee schedule established by the board. The board shall adopt the schedule of fees pursuant to Section 1530. The board shall establish the fees so as to be sufficient on the average to pay the administrative expenses of the board in processing, reviewing, and preparing a report on the claims submitted to the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 741, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1529.

Each person or entity who files a notice pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 4999) shall pay an annual fee according to a fee schedule established by the board. The board shall adopt the schedule of fees pursuant to Section 1530. The board shall set the filing fees in an amount that is sufficient, on the average, to pay the administrative expenses of the board in processing, compiling, and retaining the notices.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 741, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1529.5.

(a) The board shall adopt a schedule of fees pursuant to Section 1530 to recover costs incurred in administering Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 10735) of Part 2.74 of Division 6. Recoverable costs include, but are not limited to, costs incurred in connection with investigations, facilitation, monitoring, hearings, enforcement, and administrative costs in carrying out these actions.

(b) The fee schedule adopted under this section may include, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) A fee for participation as a petitioner or party to an adjudicative proceeding.

(2) A fee
 for the filing of a report pursuant to Part 5.2 (commencing with Section 5200) of Division 2.

(c) Consistent with Section 3 of Article XIII A of the California Constitution, the board shall set the fees under this section in an amount sufficient to cover all costs incurred and expended from the Water Rights Fund for the purposes of Part 5.2 (commencing with Section 5200) and Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 10735) of Part 2.74 of Division 6. In setting these fees, the board is not required to fully recover these costs in the year or the year immediately after the costs are incurred, but the board may provide for recovery of these costs over a period of years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 347, Sec. 7.   (AB 1739)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1530.

(a) The board shall adopt, by emergency regulation, the schedules of fees authorized under this article. The emergency regulation may include provisions concerning the administration and collection of the fees. The fee schedules may be graduated in accordance with the number of diversions or the amount of water involved. The board shall periodically adjust the amount of the fees specified in the schedule in accordance with this article.

(b) The emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this section, any amendment thereto, or subsequent adjustments to the regulations, shall be adopted by the board in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The adoption of these regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, any emergency regulations adopted by the board, or any adjustment to an annual fee made by the board pursuant to this section, shall remain in effect until revised by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 741, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Collection and Enforcement [1535. - 1541.]

1535.

(a) Any fee subject to this chapter that is required in connection with the filing of an application, registration, request, statement, or proof of claim, other than an annual fee required after the period covered by the initial filing fee, shall be paid to the board.

(b) If a fee established under subdivision (b) of Section 1525, Section 1528, or Section 13160.1 is not paid when due, the board may cancel the application, registration, petition, request, statement, or claim, or may refer the matter to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration for collection of the unpaid fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 401, Sec. 15.   (AB 1520)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1536.

All annual fees, other than the initial filing fee required in connection with the filing of an application, registration, petition, or request, or proof of claim, and all unpaid fees and expenses referred to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration for collection pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1535 or Section 2868, shall be paid to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 401, Sec. 16.   (AB 1520)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1537.

(a) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall collect any fee or expense required to be paid to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration under this chapter.

(b) (1) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall collect the fees pursuant to the Fee Collection Procedures Law (Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code).

(2) Notwithstanding the appeal provisions in the Fee Collection Procedures Law, a determination by the board that a person or entity is required to pay a fee, or a determination by the board regarding
 the amount of that fee, is subject to review under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1120) of Part 1 and is not subject to a petition for redetermination by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(3) Notwithstanding the refund provisions in the Fee Collection Procedures Law, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall not accept any claim for refund that is based on the assertion that a determination by the board improperly or erroneously calculated the amount of a fee, or incorrectly determined that the person or entity is subject to the fee, unless that determination has been set aside by the board or a court reviewing the determination of the board.

(4) This subdivision shall not be construed to apply Chapter 4 (commencing with Section
 1120) of Part 1 to the adoption of regulations under this chapter or to a determination of expenses under Part 3 (commencing with Section 2000).

(c) The board shall provide to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration the name and address of each person or entity who is liable for a fee or expense, the amount of the fee or expense, and the due date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 401, Sec. 17.   (AB 1520)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1538.

In any proceeding pursuant to Section 1052 in which it is determined that there has been a violation of the prohibition against the unauthorized diversion or use of water subject to this division, the board or court, as the case may be, may impose an additional liability in the amount of any annual fees that would have been required under this division if the diversion or use had been authorized by a permit or license to appropriate water.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 741, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1539.

If a permit or license holder fails to pay an annual fee imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1525 for a period of five years, the board may revoke the permit or license in accordance with the procedures for revocation specified in Section 1241.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 741, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1540.

If the board determines that the person or entity on whom a fee or expense is imposed will not pay the fee or expense based on the fact that the fee payer has sovereign immunity under Section 1560, the board may allocate the fee or expense, or an appropriate portion of the fee or expense, to persons or entities who have contracts for the delivery of water from the person or entity on whom the fee or expense was initially imposed. The allocation of the fee or expense to these contractors does not affect ownership of any permit, license, or other water right, and does not vest any equitable title in the contractors.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 741, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1541.

This article applies to any fee established or required to be paid under Article 1 (commencing with Section 1525), to any fee or expense set to cover the expenses of the board under Part 3 (commencing with Section 2000), and to any fee set under Section 13160.1 that is required to be deposited in the Water Rights Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 741, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Water Rights Fund [1550. - 1552.]

1550.

There is in the State Treasury a Water Rights Fund, which is hereby established.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 741, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1551.

All of the following shall be deposited into the Water Rights Fund:

(a) All fees, expenses, and penalties collected by the board or the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration under this chapter and Part 3 (commencing with Section 2000).

(b) All funds collected pursuant to Section 1052, Article 4 (commencing with Section 1845) of Chapter 12, or Section 5107.

(c) All fees and penalties collected pursuant to Sections 13160.1 and 13385 in connection with certificates for activities involving an appropriation of water subject to this part, hydroelectric power projects subject to
 licensing by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, or other diversions of water for beneficial use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 401, Sec. 18.   (AB 1520)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1552.

Except as provided in subdivision (e) of Section 1058.5, moneys in the Water Rights Fund are available for expenditure, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the following purposes:

(a) For expenditure by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration in the administration of this chapter and the Fee Collection Procedures Law (Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code) in connection with any fee or expense subject to this chapter.

(b) For the payment of refunds, pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, of fees or expenses collected pursuant to this chapter.

(c) For expenditure by the board for the purposes of carrying out this division, Division 1 (commencing with Section 100), Part 2 (commencing with Section 10500) and Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 10735) of Part 2.74 of Division 6, Article 7 (commencing with Section
 13550) of Chapter 7 of Division 7, and the water diversion related provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 26060) of Division 10 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) For expenditures by the board for the purposes of carrying out Sections 13160 and 13160.1 in connection with activities involving hydroelectric power projects subject to licensing by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.

(e) For expenditures by the board for the purposes of carrying out Sections 13140 and 13170 in connection with plans and policies that address the diversion or use of water.

(f) For expenditures by the Department of Fish and Wildlife for purposes of carrying out Article 2 (commencing with Section 1433) of
 Chapter 6.5 and Article 2 (commencing with Section 1443) of Chapter 6.6, consistent with the amounts estimated under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 1525.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 18, Sec. 7.   (AB 92)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Sovereign Immunity [1560. - 1560.]

1560.

(a) The fees and expenses established under this chapter and Part 3 (commencing with Section 2000) apply to the United States and to Indian tribes, to the extent authorized under federal or tribal law.

(b) If the United States or an Indian tribe declines to pay a fee or expense, or the board determines that the United States or the Indian tribe is likely to decline to pay a fee or expense, the board may do any of the following:

(1) Initiate appropriate action to collect the fee or expense, including any appropriate enforcement action for failure to pay the fee or expense, if the board determines that federal or tribal law authorizes collection of the fee or expense.

(2) Allocate the fee or expense, or an appropriate portion of the fee or expense, in accordance with Section 1540. The board may make this allocation as part of the emergency regulations adopted pursuant to Section 1530.

(3) Enter into a contractual arrangement that requires the United States or the Indian tribe to reimburse the board, in whole or in part, for the services furnished by the board, either directly or indirectly, in connection with the activity for which the fee or expense is imposed.

(4) Refuse to process any application, registration, petition, request, or proof of claim for which the fee or expense is not paid, if the board determines that refusal would not be inconsistent with federal law or the public interest.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 741, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Licenses [1600. - 1675.2.]



  ARTICLE 1. Report of Completion [1600. - 1600.]

1600.

Immediately upon completion of the construction of works and application of the water to beneficial use the permittee shall report the completion to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 289.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Examination and Inspection [1605. - 1605.]

1605.

The board shall as soon as practicable after receiving the report of completion cause to be made a full inspection and examination of the works constructed and the use of water therefrom. The permittee shall furnish the board with such records, data, and information as may be required to enable the board to determine the amount of water that has been applied to beneficial use and whether the construction of the works and the use of the water therefrom is in conformity with law, the rules and regulations of the board, and the permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 289.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Issuance or Refusal of License [1610. - 1611.]

1610.

If the determination of the board as to completion is favorable to the permittee, the board shall issue a license which confirms the right to the appropriation of such an amount of water as has been determined to have been applied to beneficial use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 289.)
-------------------------------------------

1610.5.

Before issuing a license for an amount of water or season of use less than that specified in the permit, the board shall either obtain the consent of the permittee or afford him an opportunity to (a) show cause why the amount or season of use should not be reduced or, (b) request an extension of time pursuant to Section 1398.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 289.)
-------------------------------------------

1611.

If the board determines that the construction and condition of the works or the use of water therefrom are not in conformity with the law, the rules and regulations of the board, or the terms of the permit, it may revoke the permit in the manner provided in Article 5 (commencing with Section 1410) of Chapter 6 of this part. The board may in its discretion allow a reasonable time for the permittee to correct discrepancies in the works or use of water before taking action to revoke the permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 289.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Contents and Conditions of License [1625. - 1631.]

1625.

Each license shall be in such form and contain such terms as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

1626.

All licenses shall be under the terms and conditions of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1627.

A license shall be effective for such time as the water actually appropriated under it is used for a useful and beneficial purpose in conformity with this division but no longer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1628.

Every license shall include the enumeration of conditions therein which in substance shall include all of the provisions of this article and the statement that any appropriator of water to whom a license is issued takes the license subject to the conditions therein expressed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1629.

Every licensee, if he accepts a license, does so under the conditions precedent that no value whatsoever in excess of the actual amount paid to the State therefor shall at any time be assigned to or claimed for any license granted or issued under the provisions of this division, or for any rights granted or acquired under the provisions of this division, in respect to the regulation by any competent public authority of the services or the price of the services to be rendered by any licensee or by the holder of any rights granted or acquired under the provisions of this division or in respect to any valuation for purposes of sale to or purchase, whether through condemnation proceedings or otherwise, by the State or any city, city and county, municipal water district, irrigation district, lighting district, or any political subdivision of the State, of the rights and property of any licensee, or the possessor of any rights granted, issued, or acquired under the provisions of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1630.

At any time after the expiration of twenty years after the granting of a license, the State or any city, city and county, municipal water district, irrigation district, lighting district, or any political subdivision of the State shall have the right to purchase the works and property occupied and used under the license and the works built or constructed for the enjoyment of the rights granted under the license.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

1631.

In the event that the State, or any city, city and county, municipal water district, irrigation district, lighting district, or political subdivision of the State so desiring to purchase and the owner of the works and property can not agree upon the purchase price, the price shall be determined in such manner as is now or may hereafter be provided by law for determining the value of property taken in eminent domain proceedings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Filing of Licenses and Orders with County Recorder [1650. - 1651.]

1650.

A true copy of each license issued or of each order modifying or changing a license shall within 30 days after issuance thereof be recorded by the board in the office of the recorder of the county in which the point of diversion specified in the license lies or in case there are points of diversion lying in more than one county then in each of those counties in which a point of diversion lies and in case the place or places of use specified in the license are in different counties than the point or points of diversion also in the county or counties in which the place or places of use lie.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

1651.

Whenever an order revoking a license in whole or in part becomes final a true copy of the order shall be recorded promptly by the board in the office or offices in which a copy of the license affected is recorded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Revocation of Licenses [1675. - 1675.2.]

1675.

(a) If, at any time after a license is issued, the board finds that the licensee has not put the water granted under the license to a useful or beneficial purpose in conformity with this division or that the licensee has ceased to put the water to that useful or beneficial purpose, or that the licensee has failed to observe any of the terms and conditions in the license, the board may revoke the license and declare the water to be subject to appropriation in accordance with this part.

(b) The board may revoke the license upon request of the licensee or after due notice to the licensee and after a hearing, when a hearing is requested by the licensee pursuant to Section 1675.1.

(c) As used in this section “licensee” includes the heirs, successors, or assigns of the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 14.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1675.1.

The notice of proposed revocation of the license pursuant to Section 1675 shall contain a statement of facts and information upon which the proposed revocation is based, and shall include a statement substantially in the following form:

Unless a written request for a hearing signed by or on behalf of the licensee is delivered or mailed to the board within 15 days after receipt of this notice, the board may act upon the proposed revocation of the license without a hearing. Any request for a hearing may be made by delivering or mailing the request to the board at the address given on the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 794.)